Utah statutes.
53A-3-428.   Collective bargaining agreement -- Website posting.

(1)  As used in this section, "collective bargaining agreement" includes:

(a)  a master agreement; and

(b)  an amendment, addendum, memorandum, or other document modifying the master agreement.

(2)  The board of education of a school district:

(a)  shall post on the school district's website a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the board of education within 10 days of the ratification of the agreement; and

(b)  may remove from the school district's website a collective bargaining agreement that is no longer in effect.

(3)  The governing board of a charter school:

(a)  shall post on the charter school's website a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the governing board of the charter school within 10 days of the ratification of the agreement; and

(b)  may remove from the charter school's website a collective bargaining agreement that is no longer in effect.



Enacted by Chapter 392, 2009 General Session

